Idaho, session 2026, H0905.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Office of the State Board of Education
the following amounts for the OSBE Administration Program to be expended
according to the designated expense classes from the listed funds for the
period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $998,400 $998,400
Federal Grant
Fund 1,090,400 $2,909,600 4,000,000
TOTAL $2,088,800 $2,909,600 $4,998,400
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation to the Office of the State Board of Education for the OSBE
Administration Program from the General Fund is hereby reduced by the fol-
lowing amounts according to the designated expense classes for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $492,300
Operating Expenditures 18,200
TOTAL $510,500
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, the full-time equivalent position authorization pro-
vided to the Office of the State Board of Education is hereby reduced by four
(4.00) for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.


SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.